Hawaii, session 2026, SB1606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 708-814.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (3) to read as follows: "(3) [Criminal] A person who commits the offense of criminal trespass onto public parks and recreational grounds [is] shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor[.]; provided that if the person subsequently commits the offense by returning within thirty days to the same public park or recreational ground at which the person initially committed the offense, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for the subsequent offense." SECTION 2.  Section 708-814.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (2) to read as follows: "(2)  [Criminal] A person who commits the offense of criminal trespass onto state lands [is] shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor[.]; provided that if the person subsequently commits the offense by returning within thirty days to the same land at which the person initially committed the offense, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for the subsequent offense." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________